Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
When determining an applicant’s eligibility for benefits  or services that are
offered by or through a state agency, the state agency may use a summary of benefits letter
from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
SECTION 2.  ORS 413.650 is amended to read:
413.650. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Dental care organization” means a prepaid managed care  health services organization, as
defined in ORS 414.025, that provides dental care to members of a coordinated care organization.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Veteran” means an individual who is a veteran,  as defined in ORS 408.225, except the in-
dividual may be discharged or released under honorable or other than honorable conditions.
(2) The Veterans Dental Program is established in  the Oregon Health Authority and shall be
administered in collaboration  with the Department of Consumer and Business Services. The purpose
of the program is to provide oral health care to eligible veterans who are residing in Oregon.
(3) The authority shall contract with dental care  organizations throughout this state and with
individual oral  health care providers in areas of this state that are not served by dental care or-
ganizations to provide oral health care to veterans enrolled in the Veterans Dental Program.
(4) Enrollees in the Veterans Dental  Program shall receive the types and extent of oral health
care services that the authority determines will be  provided to medical assistance recipients in ac-
cordance with ORS 414.065, without  any corresponding copayments, deductibles or cost sharing re-
quired.
(5) An individual is eligible for the Veterans Dental Program if the individual:
(a) Is a resident of Oregon;
(b) Is ineligible for medical assistance;
(c) Has income that is at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and
(d) Is a veteran.
(6) The authority shall:
(a) Prescribe by rule a simple application process for the Veterans Dental Program.
(b) Provide assistance, in person or by telephone, to applicants  for and enrollees in the program.
(c) Require and accept as verification of eligibility:
(A) Documentation demonstrating  that an applicant’s income is at or below 400 percent of the
federal poverty guidelines[ .]; and
Enrolled House Bill 2559 (HB 2559-B) Page 1
(B)(i) An applicant’s federal DD Form 214 or 215 ; or
(ii) An applicant’s summary of benefits letter  from the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs.
Passed by House April 15, 2025
Repassed by House May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2559 (HB 2559-B) Page 2